Utah statutes.
78B-14-313.   Costs and fees.
(1)  The petitioner may not be required to pay a filing fee or other costs.
(2)  If an obligee prevails, a responding tribunal may assess against an
obligor filing fees, reasonable attorney fees, other costs, and necessary
travel and other reasonable expenses incurred by the obligee and the obligee's
witnesses.  The tribunal may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against the
obligee or the support enforcement agency of either the initiating or the
responding state, except as provided by law.  Attorney fees may be taxed as
costs, and may be ordered paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the
order in the attorney's own name.  Payment of support owed to the obligee has
priority over fees, costs, and expenses.
(3)  The tribunal shall order the payment of costs and reasonable attorney
fees if it determines that a hearing was requested primarily for delay.  In a
proceeding under Part 6, Registration, Enforcement, and Modification of
Support Order, a hearing is presumed to have been requested primarily for
delay if a registered support order is confirmed or enforced without change.
